test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kaš: # Noun 69 'eng /est kass/fin' - full paradigm
     kaš+N+Sg+Nom: kaš
     kaš+N+Sg+Gen: kaš
     kaš+N+Sg+Par: kaššõ
     kaš+N+Sg+Dat: kaššõn
     kaš+N+Sg+Ins: kaššõks
     kaš+N+Sg+Ill: kaššõ
     kaš+N+Sg+Ela: kaššõst
     kaš+N+Pl+Nom: kašīd
     kaš+N+Pl+Gen: kašīd
     kaš+N+Pl+Par: kašīdi
     kaš+N+Pl+Dat: kašīdõn
     kaš+N+Pl+Ins: kašīdõks
     kaš+N+Pl+Ill: kašīz
     kaš+N+Pl+Ela: kašīst
